tutorial-env/lib/python3.6/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_es.dic
ISO8859-1
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.desa4s
.sa5b
.se3d
.se3l
a1a2
2a3b
4abori
3abrig
3abríg
3a4bro
3a4bró
a2cac
2acra
a4cre
a3cul
2ad
4ad.
4ada
3adj
4ado
3adyuvan
2ae
a1e2l
a1em
ae2r
a1es
2afia
2afiá
2afie
2afié
2afió
2afí
3afíl
3afín
2ahu
3ahum
2ai
2aí
3aís
2a3la
4a5laban.
3alag
2a3lá
2ald
2a3le.
a3leg
2a3lem
2a3len.
2a3les
2a3lé
3alig
a3liz
2all
2a3lo.
a3lob
a3los
2a3ló.
a3lub
2ame
2an
a3na
a3ne
3a2noc
an2tem
an2tin
2añ
a3o2f
a3or
2aos
a1ó
2aq
2ar
4ar.
4a3ra
4a3rá
4arc
4a3re
4a3ré
4a3ri
4arí
4arl
4arn
4a3ro
4a3ró
4arrol
4arról
4ars
4arz
2a1s
6as.
as2a
asa3t
4a3s2e
5a4seg
3asn
6ast
7astí
a3tis
a3tiv
a4trod
a4yu
2az
3azog
3azóg
á2d
1álm
á1s
ás2a
1ásn
á2te
1b2
b3c
2b3d
be1
5bes
bes2a
bie2n1
2bj
5bori
b4r
4brig
4bríg
2bs
b3sa
b3se
b3si
b3so
2b3t
bue3
2b3v
2by
1c2
c4a
3ca5b
caca4
3car
ca3te
3cá
2c3c
ce1s
ces2a
3ch
2c3n
3co.
co3ha
3cr
2c3t
3cud
1d2
3da
de2h
des5ad
des5as
2dh
2dj
2d3l
2d3m
2d3n
3do
4dorá
4doré
4dorm
4dorn
d4r
d3s
3dum
3dur
d3v
2dy
2e2a
ea5j
e3a4y
2e2á
2ec
e2dif
2ee
ee3d
2eé
2eg
e1ha
e1hi
e2his
e1ho
e1hum
2ei1
e3i2g
2eme
2emo
2empeñ
2empé
3empég
2en.
e3ni
e4n3in
en3t
2eo
e3o4j
2eq
2er
e3rá
e3ré
2es.
es3ad
esa4lab
es3añ
es3ar
es3as
es1e
e3t
etas4
e1ú
e2x
e3xi
ée1
é2p
ér2c
é1s2
1f4
fe1s
fes6a
3fia
3fiá
3fie
3fié
fi3no
3fió
3fí
4fíl
4fín
1g2
g4a
2g3m
2g3n
2gs
2g3z
2hal
2ham
2harr
2hen
he1s
2hig
hue1
2hus
hú1
2i
i1aé
i1au
i3cua
ie2no
ie3no.
ie1s
i1esp
i1hi
i1ho
i3i
ija2m
i5la
illa3no
i1n
in2h
3inq
i3o2x
i5re
i1s2a
isa3g
i1se
i2x
i3xi
íge2
í1n
í3no
ín3t
í2r
í3ra
í1se
3j
je1s
4jus
4jú
1l
4labe
4lagá
4lago
4lagó
2lb
2lc
2ld
le1s
les2a
2lf
2lg
2lh
l4i
li2cu
2ligu
3liv
lí2cu
3l2l
2lm
2l1n
2lp
2lq
2l1s2
2lt
2lv
2lz
1m
3man
ma3no
2mb
3me
me1s
mes6a
3mie
2m1n
3mos
2mp
3muel
1na
n2al
3nal.
n3anda
3nar
na5re
na2ven
3ná
2nc
2nd
nde1s
ndes6a
1ne
3né
2nf
2ng
n1hec
n1hi
1ni
1ní
2nj
2nl
2nm
2n1n
1no
2no.
n3o2li
1nó
2nq
2nr
2n1s
ns2a
nsa3g
2nt
n2teb
n2tei
n2tesa
n2tib
n2tico
n2tid
n2ties
n2tim
n2tio
n2tiparl
n2tir
n2tita
n3trac
n3trav
1nu
1nú
2nv
2ny
2nz
3ñ
ñe1s
4ñud
2o1
o2a
o3a4c
oa2d
o3adu
oa2lig
o3au
o3a2x
o2á
o2e
o3e2f
o3e4x
o2h
o3her
o3hone
ol2te
on2tr
oo2
o3op
o3orde
4operat
5operativa
o3pl
os2a
os2e
ó1
1ó2x
1p2
p4a
2p3c
pe1sa
pla3no
2p3n
3pon
2p3s2
2p3t
3q
1r
r4a
ra1en
ra1h
ra3in
ra3t
rá3t
2rb
2rc
2rd
re1he
4rena
4rená
re1s4a
re1s2e
2rf
2rg
2rh
3rí
2rj
2rl
2rm
2r1n
2rp
2rq
r4r
3rria
3rrol
3rról
2r1s2
2rt
2rv
2rz
rzo3
s1a2
1sa.
s3a4bar
s3a4bast
s3a4be
s3a4bo
1sabori
1sabr
2sabrig
2sabríg
2sabro
2sabró
2s3a4bu
1sacra
s4adu
1safia
1safiá
1safie
1safié
1safió
1safí
2safíl
2safín
1sahu
2sahum
1sai
2s3ais
1saí
2saís
1sala
2s3alab
3salaban.
2sa4lag
1salá
1sale.
1salem
1salen.
1sales
1salé
1salo.
1saló.
s3anc
s3anda
s3andá
s3andu
1sang
2s3ange
s3ani
s3anu
s5aren
1sarrol
1sarról
1sarz
sa4sea
sa4seá
s7asti
1sastr
1saz
sazo3
2sazog
2sazóg
1sá
2sálm
sá2n
2s1áni
2sásn
2s1á2t
2sb
4sc
2sd
1se.
1sea
1seá
1sec
s1ed
se2du
1see
1seé
1seg
s2el
s3e2le
1sell
1seme
1sempeñ
1sempé
2sempég
se2n
1seo
1seq
2s3e4qui
1ser
1ses.
se1s2a
se1se
1sé
2sf
2sg
2s1h
1si
2sj
2sl
2sm
2s1n
1so
2s3o4j
1só
2sp
2sq
2s3t
3su
2sv
1t4
3te.
2te3al
2teano
2teay
2tecam
2tecám
2teco
3teco.
3tecos
2tecr
2ted
2tef
3tefe
2tegu
2teju
2tema
2temu
2teno
2teoj
2tep
te1sa
te1se
2tete
2tev
2ti.
2tiaé
tia3no
2tiau
2ticarr
2ticic
2ticle
2ticri
3tido
2tifa
2tigra
2tigub
2ti1h
2tii
3timon
4timono
3tino
2tipap
2tiparasi
2tipi
3tipiri
2tipú
2tisem
2tisé
2tisi
2tiso
2tito
2titub
2tivir
2tíg
2tít
2t5m
3trae.
3traed
3traé
3traig
3traí
3tral
3trapea
3trar
4trarr
3trat
3tray
3trá
3tri
3tro
2tú
2u
u2bal
uen4a
uena3v
ue1s2a
ui3no
u1s2a
usa3t
u1se
u3u
ú2l
ú1n
1v
3var
ve1s
vé3a
vo3h
1x
3xa
3xu
3y
ye1s
2yu
1z
za5re
2zc
2zg
2zm
2z1n
3zo
4zog
zo4o
3zó
4zóg
2zt
